en: Fuel supply: Avgas; Biofuel; Diesel; Electric; Flex fuel; Gasoline; Hybrid; Jet fuel; Mogas; Petrol; Plug-in hybrid; Other
fi: Polttoaineen syöttö: Avgas; Biopolttoaine; Diesel; Sähkö; Flex fuel; Bensiini; Hybridi; Lentopetroli; Mogas; Bensiini; Ladattava hybridi; Muu
nl: Brandstoftoevoer: Avgas; Biobrandstof; Diesel; Elektrisch; Flexibele brandstof; Benzine; Hybride; Kerosine; Mogas; Benzine; Plug-inhybride; Andere
th: การจ่ายน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: น้ำมันอากาศยาน; เชื้อเพลิงชีวภาพ; ดีเซล; ไฟฟ้า; น้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงแบบยืดหยุ่น; น้ำมันเบนซิน; แบบไฮบริด; น้ำมันเครื่องบิน; น้ำมันเบนซินที่ใช้กับรถยนต์; น้ำมันเบนซิน; ปลั๊กอินไฮบริด; อื่นๆ
vi: Cung cấp nhiên liệu: Xăng máy bay; Nhiên liệu sinh học; Diesel; Xe lăn điện; Nhiên liệu linh hoạt; Xăng; Ván kết hợp; Nhiên liệu phản lực; Xăng dùng cho động cơ; Xăng dầu; Lai sạc điện; Khác
pt-BR: Abastecimento de combustível: Gasolina de aviação; Biocombustível; Diesel; Elétrica; Combustível flex; Gasolina; Híbrida; Combustível de avião; Mogas; Gasolina; Plug-in híbrido; Outro
da: Brændstofforsyning: Avgas; Biobrændstof; Diesel; Elektrisk; Flex-brændstof; Benzin; Hybrid; Jetbrændstof; Mogas; Benzin; Plug-in hybrid; Andet
hu: Üzemanyag-ellátás: Avgas; Bioüzemanyag; Dízel; Elektromos; Vegyes üzemű; Benzin; Hibrid; Kerozin; Motorbenzin; Benzin; Hálózatról tölthető hibrid; Egyéb
hr-HR: Napajanje gorivom: Avgas; Biogorivo; Dizel; Električno; Fleksibilno gorivo; Benzin; Hibridno; Mlazno gorivo; Obični benzin; Benzin; Plug-in hibrid; Ostalo
zh-CN: 燃油供应: 航空汽油; 生物燃料; 柴油; 电动; 弹性燃料; 汽油; 混合型; 喷气燃料; 车用汽油; 汽油; 插电式混合动力; 其他
de: Kraftstoffversorgung: AvGas; Biokraftstoff; Diesel; Elektrisch; Flex fuel; Benzin; Hybrid; Kerosin; MoGas; Benzin; Plug-in-Hybrid; Sonstiges
pl: Zapas paliwa: Avgas; Biopaliwa; ON; Elektryczny; Paliwo typu flex fuel; Benzyna; Hybrydowy; Paliwo do silników odrzutowych; Mogas; Benzyna; Hybryda plug-in; Inne
el: Παροχή καυσίμου: Αεροπορικό καύσιμο; Βιοκαύσιμο; Ντίζελ; Ηλεκτρικό; Ευέλικτο καύσιμο; Βενζίνη; Υβριδικό; Καύσιμο αεριωθουμένων; Mogas; Πετρελαίου; Plug-in υβριδικό; Άλλο
es: Suministro de combustible: Avgas; Biocombustible; Diésel; Eléctrico; Combustible flex; Gasolina; Híbrido; Combustible para aviones; Mogas; Petróleo; Híbrido enchufable; Otros
pt-PT: Abastecimento de combustível: Avgas; Biocombustível; Gasóleo; Elétrico; Veículo de combustível duplo; Gasolina; Híbrido; Combustível para aviação; Mogas; Gasolina; Plug-in híbrido; Outro
ko: 연료 공급: 항공휘발유; 바이오연료; 디젤; 전자식; 플렉스 퓨얼; 가솔린; 하이브리드; 제트 연료; 휘발유; 가솔린; 플러그인 하이브리드; 기타
ru: Топливо: Авиабензин; Биотопливо; Дизель; Электричество; Гибкое топливо; Бензин; Гибридные; Реактивное топливо; Автомобильный бензин; Бензин; Гибрид с подключаемым модулем; Другой
fr: Réserve de carburant: Avgas; Biocarburant; Diesel; Électrique; Carburant modulable; Gasoline; Hybrid; Kérosène; Mogas; Essence; Hybride rechargeable; Autre
nb: Drivstofftilførsel: Avgas; Biodrivstoff; Diesel; Elektrisk; Flex-drivstoff; Bensin; Hybrid; Flybensin; Mogas; Bensin; Plug-in hybrid; Annet
it: Rifornimento di carburante: Avgas; Biocarburante; Diesel; Elettrico; Carburante flessibile; Benzina; Ibrido; Carburante per jet; Mogas; Benzina; Ibrido plug in; Altro
sl-SI: Oskrba z gorivom: Avgas; Biogorivo; Dizel; Elektrika; Prilagodljivo gorivo; Bencin; Hibrid; Reaktivno gorivo; Mogas; Bencinska; Priključni hibrid; Drugo
zh-TW: 燃油供應: 航空汽油; 生質燃料; 柴油; 電動式; 彈性燃料; 汽油; 混合; 航空煤油; 車用汽油; 汽油; 插電式混合動力; 其他
sv: Bränsletillförsel: Flygbensin; Biobränsle; Diesel; Elektrisk; Flexbränsle; Bensin; Hybrid; Flygbränsle; Bensin; Petroleum; Laddhybrid; Övrigt
lt-LT: Degalų šaltinis: Aviacinis kuras; Biokuras; Dyzelinas; Elektrinis; „Flex Fuel“; Benzinas; Hibridinė; Reaktyvinis kuras; Variklių degalai; Benzinas; Įkraunamas hibridas; Kita
cs: Zásobování palivem: Avgas; Biopalivo; Motorová nafta; Elektrický; Flexibilní palivo; Benzín; Hybridní; Tryskové palivo; Motorový benzín; Benzín; Plug-in hybrid; Jiné
ro-RO: Alimentare combustibil: Avgas; Biocombustibil; Motorină; Electric; Combustibil flexibil; Gazolină; Hibrid; Combustibil pentru avioane; Benzină de motor; Benzină; Hibrid reîncărcabil; Altele
ja: 燃料供給: 航空機用燃料; バイオ燃料; ディーゼル; 電気; フレックス燃料; ガソリン; ハイブリッド; ジェット燃料; モガス; ガソリン; プラグインハイブリッド; その他
tr: Yakıt tedariki: Avgaz; Biyoyakıt; Dizel; Akülü; Esnek yakıt; Benzin; Hibrit; Jet yakıtı; Mogas; Petrol; Bataryalı hibrit; Diğer
bg-BG: Подаване на гориво: Avgas; Биогориво; Дизел; Електрически; Flex fuel; Бензин; Хибрид; Реактивно гориво; Mogas; Бензин; Plug-in хибрид; Други
sk-SK: Zdroj paliva: Avgas; Biopalivo; Naftový; Elektrický; Flex palivo; Benzínový; Hybridný; Letecké palivo; Mogas; Benzínový; Plug-in hybrid; Iné